District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.52

District Council authority over elections.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or of any other law, the Council shall have authority to enact any act or resolution with respect to matters involving or relating to elections in the District.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 836, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 752
District of Columbia administration, self-government, supersession of inconsistent laws, see § 1-207.61.
This section is referenced in § 1-207.17, § 1-207.61, and § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-1307.
1973 Ed., § 1-1105a.
Definitions applicable: The definitions contained in § 1-201.03 apply to this section.